North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153. Counties and County Commissioners. [Repealed]
§§ 153-1 through 153-382.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 822.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter was repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 822, which enacted new Chapter 153A, Counties. The following sections were transferred by the 1973 act to other Chapters: G.S. 153-177 to 153-198 was transferred to former

G.S. 162-31

and

G.S. 162-32

to 162-49 by Session Laws 1973, c. 822, s. 3; G.S. 153-295 to 153-324 were transferred to

G.S. 162A-64

to 162A-80 by Session Laws 1973, c. 822, s. 4.

Session Laws 1973, c. 822, ss. 9 through 12, provided:

“Sec. 9. No provision of this act is intended, nor may any be construed, to affect in any way a right or interest, public or private:

“(a) Now vested or accrued, in whole or in part, the validity of which might be sustained or preserved by reference to a provision of law repealed by this act; or

“(b) Derived from or which might be sustained or preserved in reliance upon, action (including the adoption of orders, resolutions, or ordinances) taken before the effective date of this act pursuant to or within the scope of a provision of law repealed by this act.

“Sec. 10. No law repealed, expressly or by implication, before the effective date of this act and no law granting authority that has been exhausted before the effective date of this act is revived by:

“(a) The repeal in this act of any act repealing such a law; or

“(b) Any provision of this act that disclaims an intention to repeal or affect enumerated, designated, or described laws.

“Sec. 11. No provision of this act is intended, nor may any be construed, to impair the obligation of any bond, note, or coupon outstanding on the effective date of this act.

“Sec. 12. No action or proceeding of any nature (whether civil or criminal, judicial or administrative, or otherwise) pending at the effective date of this act is abated or otherwise affected by the adoption of this act.”